Missouri, session 2026, HB1878.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 537.104, to read as follows:
537.104. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commercial entity", includes corporations, limited liability companies,
partnerships, limited partnerships, sole proprietorships, or other legally recognized
entities;
(2) "Distribute", to issue, sell, give, provide, deliver, transfer, transmute,
circulate, or disseminate by any means;
(3) "Internet", the international computer network of both federal and
nonfederal interoperable packet-switched data networks;
(4) "Material harmful to minors", all of the following:
(a) Any material that the average person, applying contemporary community
standards, would find taking the material as a whole and with respect to minors is
designed to appeal to, or is designed to pander to, the prurient interest;
(b) Any of the following material that exploits, is devoted to, or principally
consists of descriptions of actual, simulated, or animated display or depiction of any of
the following, in a manner patently offensive with respect to minors:
a. Pubic hair, anus, vulva, genitals, or nipple of the female breast;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1878 2
b. Touching, caressing, or fondling of nipples, breasts, buttocks, anuses, or
genitals; or
c. Sexual intercourse, masturbation, sodomy, bestiality, oral copulation,
flagellation, excretory functions, exhibitions, or any other sexual act; and
(c) The material taken as a whole lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or
scientific value for minors;
(5) "Minor", any person under eighteen years of age;
(6) "News-gathering organization", any of the following:
(a) An employee of a newspaper, news publication, or news source, printed or on
an online or mobile platform, of current news and public interest, while operating as an
employee as provided in this paragraph, who can provide documentation of such
employment with the newspaper, news publication, or news source; or
(b) An employee of a radio broadcast station, television broadcast station, cable
television operator, or wire service while operating as an employee as provided in this
paragraph, who can provide documentation of such employment;
(7) "Publish", to communicate or make material available to another person or
entity on a publicly available internet website;
(8) "Reasonable age-verification methods", any commercially available database
that is regularly used by businesses or governmental entities for the purpose of age and
identity verification, or any other commercially reasonable method of age and identity
verification.
2. (1) Any commercial entity for which it is in the regular course of trade or
business to publish or distribute in this state a website in which thirty-three percent or
more of total material on the website is material harmful to minors shall be held liable if
the entity fails to perform reasonable age-verification methods to verify the age of
individuals attempting to access the material.
(2) The age-verification provider shall not retain any identifying information of
the individual after access has been granted or denied to the material.
(3) (a) Any commercial entity that is found to have violated this section shall be
liable to an individual for damages resulting from a minor accessing the material,
including court costs and reasonable attorney's fees as ordered by the court.
(b) A commercial entity that is found to have knowingly retained identifying
information of the individual after access has been granted to the individual shall be
liable to the individual for damages resulting from retaining the identifying
information, including court costs and reasonable attorney's fees as ordered by the
court.

HB 1878 3
3. (1) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any bona fide news or
public interest broadcast, website video, report, or event and shall not be construed to
affect the rights of any news-gathering organizations.
(2) No internet service provider or its affiliates or subsidiaries, search engine, or
cloud service provider shall be held to have violated the provisions of this section for
providing access or connection to or from a website or other information or content on
the internet or a facility, system, or network not under that provider's control, including
transmission, downloading, storage, access software, or other to the extent such
provider is not responsible for the creation of the content of the communication that
constitutes material harmful to minors.
Section B. Because immediate action is necessary to protect the safety of children,
section A of this act is deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health,
welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared to be an emergency act within the meaning
of the constitution, and section A of this act shall be in full force and effect upon its passage
and approval.
✔